nb: Monteringsposisjon for motor: Dobbelt hjulnav; Forhjulnav; Midtmontert; Ekstern; Bakhjulnav; Annet
pt-BR: Posição de montagem do motor: Cubo duplo da roda; Cubo da roda dianteira; Motor central; Externo; Cubo da roda traseira; Outra
sl-SI: Položaj namestitve motorja: Dvojno kolesno pesto; Sprednje kolesno pesto; Sredinski pogon; Zunanji; Zadnje kolesno pesto; Drugo
el: Θέση τοποθέτησης κινητήρα: Πλήμνη διπλού τροχού; Πλήμνη μπροστινού τροχού; Κεντρική; Εξωτερική τοποθέτηση; Πλήμνη πίσω τροχού; Άλλο
ko: 모터 장착 위치: 듀얼 휠 허브; 프론트 휠 허브; 미드 드라이브; 오프보드; 리어 휠 허브; 기타
zh-TW: 馬達安裝位置: 雙輪轂; 前輪轂; 中置驅動; 外掛式; 後輪轂; 其他
sv: Monteringsposition för motor: Dubbla hjulnav; Framhjulsnav; Mittmonterad; Off-board; Bakhjulsnav; Annan
de: Montageposition des Motors: Dual-Radnabe; Vorderradnabe; Mittelmotor; Off-Board; Hinterradnabe; Sonstige
it: Posizione di montaggio del motore: Mozzo per ruota doppia; Mozzo per ruota anteriore; Motore centrale; Fuoribordo; Mozzo per ruota posteriore; Altro
hr-HR: Položaj montaže motora: Dvostruka glavčina kotača; Glavčina prednjeg kotača; Srednji pogon; Vanjska montaža; Glavčina stražnjeg kotača; Ostalo
bg-BG: Позиция за монтаж на двигателя: Главина на двете колела; Главина на предното колело; Централно задвижване; Извън борда; Главина на задното колело; Друго
es: Posición de montaje del motor: Cubo de rueda dual; Cubo de rueda delantera; Motor central; Externo; Cubo de rueda trasera; Otro
vi: Vị trí lắp động cơ: Đùm hai bánh; Đùm bánh trước; Đặt giữa; Đặt ngoài; Đùm bánh sau; Khác
fr: Position de montage du moteur: Double moyeu de roue; Moyeu de roue avant; Moteur central; Externe; Moyeu de roue arrière; Autre
th: ตำแหน่งการติดตั้งมอเตอร์: ดุมล้อคู่; ดุมล้อหน้า; มอเตอร์กลาง; ภายนอก; ดุมล้อหลัง; อื่นๆ
da: Monteringsposition for motoren: Dobbelt hjulnav; Forhjulnav; Centermotor; Off-board; Baghjulnav; Andet
lt-LT: Variklio tvirtinimo padėtis: Dviejų ratų stebulėse; Priekinio rato stebulėje; Viduryje; Atskirai montuojamas; Galinio rato stebulėje; Kita
pt-PT: Posição de montagem do motor: Cubo de roda dupla; Cubo de roda dianteira; Central; Externo; Cubo de roda traseira; Outro
ro-RO: Poziție de montare a motorului: Butuc roată dublă; Butuc roată din față; Transmisie centrală; Extern (off-board); Butuc roată din spate; Altele
zh-CN: 电机安装位置: 双轮毂; 前轮毂; 中置驱动; 非板载; 后轮毂; 其他
ja: モーターマウント位置: デュアルホイールハブ; フロントホイールハブ; ミッドドライブ; オフボード; リアホイールハブ; その他
ru: Позиция крепления двигателя: Два мотор-колеса; Переднее мотор-колесо; Центральный (кареточный); Внешний; Заднее мотор-колесо; Другое
sk-SK: Poloha upevnenia motora: Dvojitý náboj kolesa; Náboj predného kolesa; Stredový pohon; Mimo dosky; Náboj zadného kolesa; Iné
pl: Położenie montażu silnika: Piasty obu kół; Piasta przedniego koła; Napęd centralny; Zewnętrzny; Piasta tylnego koła; Inna
hu: Motor rögzítési pozíció: Kettős kerékagy; Első kerékagy; Középmotor; Külső; Hátsó kerékagy; Egyéb
fi: Moottorin asennussijainti: Kaksoisnapamoottori; Etupyörän napa; Keskimoottori; Ulkoinen; Takapyörän napa; Muu
en: Motor mounting position: Dual wheel hub; Front wheel hub; Mid-drive; Off-board; Rear wheel hub; Other
tr: Motor montaj konumu: Çift tekerlek göbeği; Ön tekerlek göbeği; Ortadan çekiş; Dıştan takma; Arka tekerlek göbeği; Diğer
cs: Poloha upevnění motoru: Náboj ve dvou kolech; Náboj předního kola; Středový pohon; Mimo desku (Off-board); Náboj zadního kola; Jiné
nl: Montagepositie motor: Dubbele wielnaaf; Voorwielnaaf; Middenmotor; Off-board; Achterwielnaaf; Overig